src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_aniibiish_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - VINIT - aniibiish :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     aniibiish: aniibiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+aniibiish: nidaniibiish
     2+aniibiish: gidaniibiish
     3+aniibiish: odaniibiish
     X+aniibiish: idaniibiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     aniibiish+NI+Con: aniibiishenh
     aniibiish+NI+Dim: aniibiishens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     aniibiish+NI+Pej: aniibiishish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     aniibiish+NI+Pret: aniibiishiban
     aniibiish+NI+VocPl: [aniibiishidig, aniibiishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     aniibiish+NI+Loc: aniibiishing
     aniibiish+NI+Obv: aniibiishan
     aniibiish+NI+Pl: aniibiishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con: nidaniibiishenh
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim: nidaniibiishens
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con: gidaniibiishenh
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim: gidaniibiishens
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con: odaniibiishenh
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim: odaniibiishens
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con: idaniibiishenh
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim: idaniibiishens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos: nidaniibiishim
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos: gidaniibiishim
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos: odaniibiishim
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos: idaniibiishim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej: nidaniibiishish
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej: gidaniibiishish
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej: odaniibiishish
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pej: idaniibiishish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl: nidaniibiishinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+21: gidaniibiishinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+2Pl: gidaniibiishiwaa
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Obv: odaniibiishini
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Pl: odaniibiishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pret: nidaniibiishiban
     1+aniibiish+NI+VocPl: [nidaniibiishidig, nidaniibiishidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pret: gidaniibiishiban
     2+aniibiish+NI+VocPl: [gidaniibiishidig, gidaniibiishidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pret: odaniibiishiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+VocPl: [odaniibiishidig, odaniibiishidog]
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pret: idaniibiishiban
     X+aniibiish+NI+VocPl: [idaniibiishidig, idaniibiishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Loc: nidaniibiishing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Obv: nidaniibiishan
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pl: nidaniibiishan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Loc: gidaniibiishing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Obv: gidaniibiishan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pl: gidaniibiishan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Loc: odaniibiishing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Obv: odaniibiishan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pl: odaniibiishan
     X+aniibiish+NI+Loc: idaniibiishing
     X+aniibiish+NI+Obv: idaniibiishan
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pl: idaniibiishan
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej: aniibiishenyish
     aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej: aniibiishensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret: aniibiishenyiban
     aniibiish+NI+Con+VocPl: [aniibiishenyidig, aniibiishenyidog]
     aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret: aniibiishensiban
     aniibiish+NI+Dim+VocPl: [aniibiishensidig, aniibiishensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     aniibiish+NI+Con+Loc: aniibiishenying
     aniibiish+NI+Con+Obv: aniibiishenyin
     aniibiish+NI+Con+Pl: aniibiishenyin
     aniibiish+NI+Dim+Loc: aniibiishensing
     aniibiish+NI+Dim+Obv: aniibiishensan
     aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pl: aniibiishensan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret: aniibiishishiban
     aniibiish+NI+Pej+VocPl: [aniibiishishidig, aniibiishishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     aniibiish+NI+Pej+Loc: aniibiishishing
     aniibiish+NI+Pej+Obv: aniibiishishan
     aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pl: aniibiishishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     aniibiish+NI+Pret+Loc: aniibiishibaniing
     aniibiish+NI+Pret+Obv: aniibiishibaniin
     aniibiish+NI+Pret+Pl: aniibiishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos: nidaniibiishenyim
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos: nidaniibiishensim
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos: gidaniibiishenyim
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos: gidaniibiishensim
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos: odaniibiishenyim
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos: odaniibiishensim
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos: idaniibiishenyim
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos: idaniibiishensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej: nidaniibiishenyish
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej: nidaniibiishensish
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej: gidaniibiishenyish
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej: gidaniibiishensish
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej: odaniibiishenyish
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej: odaniibiishensish
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej: idaniibiishenyish
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej: idaniibiishensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+1Pl: nidaniibiishenyinaan
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+1Pl: nidaniibiishensinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+21: gidaniibiishenyinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+2Pl: gidaniibiishenyiwaa
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+21: gidaniibiishensinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+2Pl: gidaniibiishensiwaa
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+3Obv: odaniibiishenyini
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+3Pl: odaniibiishenyiwaa
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+3Obv: odaniibiishensini
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+3Pl: odaniibiishensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret: nidaniibiishenyiban
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+VocPl: [nidaniibiishenyidig, nidaniibiishenyidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret: nidaniibiishensiban
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+VocPl: [nidaniibiishensidig, nidaniibiishensidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret: gidaniibiishenyiban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+VocPl: [gidaniibiishenyidig, gidaniibiishenyidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret: gidaniibiishensiban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+VocPl: [gidaniibiishensidig, gidaniibiishensidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret: odaniibiishenyiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+VocPl: [odaniibiishenyidig, odaniibiishenyidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret: odaniibiishensiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+VocPl: [odaniibiishensidig, odaniibiishensidog]
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret: idaniibiishenyiban
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+VocPl: [idaniibiishenyidig, idaniibiishenyidog]
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret: idaniibiishensiban
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+VocPl: [idaniibiishensidig, idaniibiishensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Loc: nidaniibiishenying
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Obv: nidaniibiishenyin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pl: nidaniibiishenyin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Loc: nidaniibiishensing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Obv: nidaniibiishensan
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pl: nidaniibiishensan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Loc: gidaniibiishenying
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Obv: gidaniibiishenyin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pl: gidaniibiishenyin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Loc: gidaniibiishensing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Obv: gidaniibiishensan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pl: gidaniibiishensan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Loc: odaniibiishenying
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Obv: odaniibiishenyin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pl: odaniibiishenyin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Loc: odaniibiishensing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Obv: odaniibiishensan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pl: odaniibiishensan
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+Loc: idaniibiishenying
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+Obv: idaniibiishenyin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pl: idaniibiishenyin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Loc: idaniibiishensing
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Obv: idaniibiishensan
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pl: idaniibiishensan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej: nidaniibiishimish
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej: gidaniibiishimish
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej: odaniibiishimish
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej: idaniibiishimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+1Pl: nidaniibiishiminaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+21: gidaniibiishiminaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+2Pl: gidaniibiishimiwaa
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Obv: odaniibiishimini
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Pl: odaniibiishimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret: nidaniibiishimiban
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+VocPl: [nidaniibiishimidig, nidaniibiishimidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret: gidaniibiishimiban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+VocPl: [gidaniibiishimidig, gidaniibiishimidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret: odaniibiishimiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+VocPl: [odaniibiishimidig, odaniibiishimidog]
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret: idaniibiishimiban
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+VocPl: [idaniibiishimidig, idaniibiishimidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Loc: nidaniibiishiming
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Obv: nidaniibiishiman
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pl: nidaniibiishiman
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Loc: gidaniibiishiming
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Obv: gidaniibiishiman
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pl: gidaniibiishiman
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Loc: odaniibiishiming
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Obv: odaniibiishiman
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pl: odaniibiishiman
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Loc: idaniibiishiming
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Obv: idaniibiishiman
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pl: idaniibiishiman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+1Pl: nidaniibiishishinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+21: gidaniibiishishinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+2Pl: gidaniibiishishiwaa
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Obv: odaniibiishishini
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Pl: odaniibiishishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret: nidaniibiishishiban
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+VocPl: [nidaniibiishishidig, nidaniibiishishidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret: gidaniibiishishiban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+VocPl: [gidaniibiishishidig, gidaniibiishishidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret: odaniibiishishiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+VocPl: [odaniibiishishidig, odaniibiishishidog]
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret: idaniibiishishiban
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pej+VocPl: [idaniibiishishidig, idaniibiishishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Loc: nidaniibiishishing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Obv: nidaniibiishishan
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pl: nidaniibiishishan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Loc: gidaniibiishishing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Obv: gidaniibiishishan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pl: gidaniibiishishan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Loc: odaniibiishishing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Obv: odaniibiishishan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pl: odaniibiishishan
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Loc: idaniibiishishing
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Obv: idaniibiishishan
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pl: idaniibiishishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+Pret: nidaniibiishinaaniban
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+VocPl: [nidaniibiishinaanidig, nidaniibiishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+Pret: gidaniibiishinaaniban
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+VocPl: [gidaniibiishinaanidig, gidaniibiishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+2Pl+Pret: gidaniibiishiwaaban
     2+aniibiish+NI+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaniibiishiwaadig, gidaniibiishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Obv+Pret: odaniibiishiniiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Obv+VocPl: [odaniibiishiniidig, odaniibiishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Pl+Pret: odaniibiishiwaaban
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Pl+VocPl: [odaniibiishiwaadig, odaniibiishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+Loc: nidaniibiishinaaning
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+Obv: nidaniibiishinaanin
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+Pl: nidaniibiishinaanin
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+Loc: gidaniibiishinaaning
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+Obv: gidaniibiishinaanin
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+Pl: gidaniibiishinaanin
